Louisiana, session 2026, SB352.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:250.4.1(C) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§250.4.1. State-owned toll facilities; toll collection and enforcement
* * *
C. No motor vehicle shall be driven and no motor vehicle or trailer shall be
towed through any state-owned toll collection facility without payment of the proper
toll. If the proper toll is not paid, as evidenced by video or electronic recording, the
registered owner of such vehicle or trailer shall be liable to make prompt payment
to the department of the proper toll and an administrative fee of twenty-five dollars
no more than two percent of the total cost of the toll, to recover cover the cost of
collecting the toll which shall be in addition to the late charge imposed pursuant
to Subsection (F)(1) of this Section.
D. The registered owner is prima facie responsible for the payment of the toll,
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-27 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 352
administrative fees, and late charges that the department may assess pursuant to this
Section. It is not a defense to liability for payment under this Section that a registered
owner was not operating the motor vehicle or trailer at the time of the failure to pay
the toll, except that the registered owner shall not be liable under this Section when
the registered owner makes a report to a law enforcement officer or agency that the
motor vehicle or trailer was stolen before the failure to pay a toll occurs or within
forty-eight hours after the registered owner becomes aware of the theft.
* * *